Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-32] Registration of protective
orders. If a conservator has been appointed in another state and a
petition for a protective order is not pending in the State of Hawaii, the
conservator appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing
court of an intent to register, may register the protective order in the State
of Hawaii by filing as a foreign judgment in a court of the State of Hawaii, in
any judicial circuit in which property belonging to the protected person is
located, certified copies of the order and letters of office and of any bond.
[L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next